Utah statutes.
11-30-7.   Pleadings -- Questions of law and fact -- Judgment.

(1)  A defendant may file, amend, or supplement any pleading to the proceeding at any time on or before the hearing, but not after the hearing begins, unless permission is given by the court.

(2)  At the time and place designated in the order, the court shall:

(a)  proceed to hear and determine all questions of law and fact; and

(b)  enter orders that will best enable the court properly to try and determine all questions of law and fact and to enter a judgment with the least possible delay.

(3)  The judgment shall be based upon a written opinion of the court that:

(a)  makes findings of fact; and

(b)  separately states the court's conclusions of law.

(4)  To the extent possible and practicable under the circumstances, the court shall render final judgment within 10 days after the day on which the hearing is concluded.



Amended by Chapter 134, 2012 General Session

